New York, session 2025-2026, S7796.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 38 and 38-a of section 3 of the public offi- 2 cers law, subdivision 38 as added by chapter 456 of the laws of 1994 and 3 subdivision 38-a as added by chapter 436 of the laws of 1998, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 38. In the county of Yates, the provisions of this section requiring a 6 person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal corpo- 7 ration of the state for which [he] such person shall be chosen or within 8 which [his] such person's official functions are required to be exer- 9 cised, shall not prevent a person from holding the office of assistant 10 district attorney of the county of Yates, other than the first assistant 11 district attorney, provided that such person resides in Yates county 12 [or], an adjoining county within the state of New York, or within 13 Chemung county. 14 38-a. In the county of Yates, the provisions of this section requiring 15 a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal 16 corporation of the state for which [he or she] such person shall be 17 chosen or within which [his or her] such person's official functions are 18 required to be exercised, shall not prevent a person regularly admitted 19 to practice as an attorney or counselor in the courts of record of this 20 state from holding the office of assistant public defender of the county 21 of Yates, provided that such person resides in the county of Yates [or], 22 an adjoining county within the state of New York, or within Chemung 23 county. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11512-03-5